Maryland, session 2026, SB0550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
5–605.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0550*

SENATE BILL 550
(a) (2) Subject to [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (4) AND (5) of this subsection,
the following individuals or groups, in the specified order of priority, may make decisions
about health care for a person who has been certified to be incapable of making an informed
decision and who has not appointed a health care agent in accordance with this subtitle or
whose health care agent is unavailable[. Individuals in a particular class may be consulted
to make a decision only if all individuals in the next higher class are unavailable]:
(i) A guardian for the patient, if one has been appointed;
(ii) The patient’s spouse or domestic partner;
(iii) An adult child of the patient;
(iv) A parent of the patient;
(v) An adult brother or sister of the patient; or
(vi) A friend or other relative of the patient who meets the
requirements of paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(3) A friend or other relative may make decisions about health care for a
patient under paragraph (2) of this subsection if the person:
(i) Is a competent individual; and
(ii) Presents an affidavit to the attending physician stating:
1. That the person is a relative or close friend of the patient;
and
2. Specific facts and circumstances demonstrating that the
person has maintained regular contact with the patient sufficient to be familiar with the
patient’s activities, health, and personal beliefs.
(4) INDIVIDUALS IN A PARTICULAR CLASS MAY BE CONSULTED TO
MAKE A DECISION ONLY IF ALL INDIVIDUALS IN THE NEXT HIGHER CLASS ARE
UNAVAILABLE.
[(4)] (5) An individual may not make decisions about health care for a
patient under paragraph (2) of this subsection if:
(i) The individual is the subject of an interim, temporary, or final
protective order and the patient is a person eligible for relief under the order; or
(ii) The individual is the spouse of the patient and:

SENATE BILL 550 3
1. The individual and patient have executed a separation
agreement; or
2. The individual or patient has filed an application for
divorce.
[(5)] (6) The attending physician shall include the affidavit present under
paragraph (3) of this subsection in the patient’s medical record.
[(6)] (7) A person who obtains new information that would prohibit an
individual from making health care decisions for a patient under paragraph [(4)] (5) of this
subsection shall provide the information to any health care provider or health care facility
providing services to the patient.
(c) (1) Any person authorized to make health care decisions for another under
this section shall base those decisions on the wishes of the patient and, if the wishes of the
patient are unknown or unclear, on the patient’s best interest.
(2) In determining the wishes of the patient, a surrogate shall consider the
patient’s:
(i) Current diagnosis and prognosis with and without the treatment
at issue;
(ii) Expressed preferences regarding the provision of, or the
withholding or withdrawal of, the specific treatment at issue or of similar treatments;
(iii) Relevant religious and moral beliefs and personal values;
(iv) Behavior, attitudes, and past conduct with respect to the
treatment at issue and medical treatment generally;
(v) Reactions to the provision of, or the withholding or withdrawal
of, a similar treatment for another individual; and
(vi) Expressed concerns about the effect on the family or intimate
friends of the patient if a treatment were provided, withheld, or withdrawn.
(d) A surrogate may not authorize[:
(1) Sterilization; or
(2) Treatment for a mental disorder] STERILIZATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.